Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8254.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-20-61 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette,
Other Tobacco Products, and Electronic Nicotine-Delivery System Products" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-20-61. Product restrictions on electronic nicotine-delivery system products.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Characterizing flavor” means a distinguishable taste or aroma, other than the taste or
aroma of tobacco or menthol, distinguishable by an ordinary consumer, imparted either prior to, or
during, consumption of an electronic nicotine-delivery system product or component part thereof,
including, but not limited to, tastes or aromas relating to any fruit, mint, menthol, wintergreen,
chocolate, vanilla, honey, candy, cocoa, dessert, alcoholic beverage, herb, or spice or which impart
a cooling or numbing sensation. The determination of whether an electronic nicotine-delivery
system product has a characterizing flavor shall not be based solely on the use of additives,
flavorings, or particular ingredients, but shall instead consider all aspects of a final product
including, but not limited to, taste, flavor and aroma, product labeling, and advertising statements.
A flavor shall be presumed to be a characterizing flavor if a dealer, manufacturer, or distributor has
made a statement or claim directed to consumers or the public about such flavor, whether expressed
or implied, that it has a distinguishable taste or aroma (other than the taste or aroma of tobacco or
menthol).

(2) “Flavored electronic nicotine-delivery system product” means any electronic nicotine-
delivery system product that imparts a characterizing flavor.
(b) The sale, or offer for sale of, or the possession with intent to sell or to offer for sale,
flavored electronic nicotine-delivery system products to consumers within the state of Rhode Island
is hereby prohibited. Compassion centers and licensed cultivators registered with the state of Rhode
Island department of business regulation-office of cannabis regulation under chapter 28.6 of title
21 are exempt from this provision except as to products that contain, are made of, or are derived
from tobacco or nicotine, natural or synthetic.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005806
========
LC005806 - Page 2 of 3